test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AY_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲áy - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AY_STEM_2

     k̲áy+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áayaa
     k̲áy+V+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲áayaan
     k̲áy+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲áayaas
     k̲áy+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áayaa.ang
     k̲áy+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲áay'ahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲áay'ahlanggan
     k̲áy+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áay'ahlanggiinii
     k̲áy+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲áay'ahlans
     k̲áy+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲áayaa'ahlang
     k̲áy+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲áayaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲áy+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲áayaa'ahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+REFLEXIVE: k̲áay'ahl
